Utah statutes.
48-1d-1109.   Annual report for division.

(1)  Each limited liability partnership and registered foreign limited liability partnership shall deliver to the division for filing an annual report that states:

(a)  the name of the limited liability partnership or foreign limited liability partnership;

(b)  the information required under Subsection 16-17-203(1);

(c)  the street and mailing addresses of its principal office;

(d)  the name of at least one partner; and

(e)  in the case of a foreign limited liability partnership, its jurisdiction of formation and any alternate name adopted under Subsection 48-1d-1206(1).

(2)  Information in an annual report must be current as of the date the report is signed by the limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership.

(3)  A report must be delivered to the division for each year following the calendar year in which the limited liability partnership's statement of qualification became effective or the registered foreign limited liability partnership registered to do business in this state:

(a)  in the case of a limited liability partnership, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the limited liability partnership statement of qualification became effective; and

(b)  in the case of a registered foreign limited liability partnership, the annual report must be delivered to the division during the month in which is the anniversary date on which the registered foreign limited liability partnership registered to do business in this state.

(4)  If an annual report does not contain the information required by this section, the division promptly shall notify the reporting limited liability partnership or registered foreign limited liability partnership in a record and return the report for correction.

(5)  If an annual report contains the name or address of a registered agent which differs from the information shown in the records of the division immediately before the annual report becomes effective, the differing information in the annual report is considered a statement of change under Section 16-17-206.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

